Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-796
Enforcement powers; county attorney; Attorney General; duties; violations; penalties.

(1) The Department of Agriculture may apply for a restraining order or a temporary, permanent, or mandatory injunction against any person violating or threatening to violate the Animal Importation Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder in order to insure compliance with the act. The district court of the county where the violation is occurring or is about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

(2) It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or the county attorney of the county in which violations of the act are occurring or are about to occur, when notified of such violations or threatened violations by the department, to cause appropriate proceedings under subsection (1) of this section to be instituted and pursued in the district court without delay. It shall also be the duty of the Attorney General or county attorney of the county in which violation of the act occurred to prosecute violations under subsection (3) of this section without delay.

(3) Any person violating the provisions of the act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class II misdemeanor for each subsequent offense.

Laws 1975, LB 321, § 16;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 31;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 12;

Laws 2003, LB 160, § 7.